Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-212 Spouses and dependents of
insured individuals. (a) Except for a policy issued under sections
431:10D-203 and 431:10D-211, insurance under any group life insurance policy
issued pursuant to this article may be extended to insure the employees or
members of such groups against loss due to the death of their spouses and
dependent children subject to the following:

(1) The spouse and dependent of the individual
insured may be covered in amounts of insurance equivalent to the amount of
coverage of the insured individual;

(2) The premiums for the insurance of the spouse or
dependent shall be paid either from funds contributed by the employer, union,
association or other person to whom the policy has been issued, or from funds
contributed by the individual insured, or from both; and

(3) An insurer may exclude or limit the coverage on
any spouse or dependent child as to whom evidence of individual insurability is
not satisfactory to the insurer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

"Dependent" means a child of the
insured individual:

(1) Under eighteen years of age;

(2) Under twenty-three years of age who is attending
an educational institution and relying upon the insured individual for
financial support; or

(3) Regardless of age who is incapable of
self-sustaining employment by reason of intellectual disability or physical
handicap and is chiefly dependent upon the insured individual for support and
maintenance.

"Individual" includes a person or a
member of any group provided in section 431:10D-202 and sections 431:10D-204
through 431:10D-210. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 122, §53; am L
2008, c 155, §3; am L 2011, c 220, §12]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next